Indiana, session 2026, HB1236.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-12-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter applies to the commission, the
education board, and every officer, employee, and agent of an office or
division within the department whenever the person has authority to
administer or enforce a law under IC 22-11 through IC 22-15,
IC 35-47.5, or IC 36-8-10.5.
(b) This chapter does not apply to the education board with
respect to IC 25-44.
SECTION 2. IC 25-0.5-2-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 37. IC 25-1-2-2.1 applies to licenses held by fire
suppression equipment professionals.
SECTION 3. IC 25-0.5-3-43 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 43. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the board of firefighting
personnel standards and education with respect to IC 25-44.
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


SECTION 4. IC 25-0.5-4-35 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 35. The board of firefighting personnel standards and
education established by IC 22-12-3-1 is a board under IC 25-1-4
with respect to IC 25-44.
SECTION 5. IC 25-0.5-8-39 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 39. An occupation described in IC 25-44 for which a
person is licensed, certified, or registered by the board of
firefighting personnel standards and education established by
IC 22-12-3-1 is a regulated occupation under IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 6. IC 25-0.5-9-38 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 38. The board of firefighting personnel standards and
education established by IC 22-12-3-1 is a board under IC 25-1-8
with respect to IC 25-44.
SECTION 7. IC 25-0.5-10-36 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36. The board of firefighting
personnel standards and education established by IC 22-12-3-1 is
a board under IC 25-1-8-6 with respect to IC 25-44.
SECTION 8. IC 25-0.5-12-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The board of firefighting
personnel standards and education established by IC 22-12-3-1 is
a board under IC 25-1-11 with respect to IC 25-44.
SECTION 9. IC 25-44 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 44. FIRE SUPPRESSION EQUIPMENT
PROFESSIONALS
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Board" refers to the board of firefighting personnel
standards and education established by IC 22-12-3-1.
Sec. 3. "Business license" refers to the following:
(1) A Class A business license described in IC 25-44-3-1.
(2) A Class B business license described in IC 25-44-3-1.
(3) A Class C business license described in IC 25-44-3-1.
(4) A Class D business license described in IC 25-44-3-1.
Sec. 4. "Carbon dioxide based engineered system" means a fire
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


suppression system that:
(1) requires individual calculations and design;
(2) uses components that are approved or recognized by a
nationally significant testing laboratory, as determined by the
board, for use in an engineered fire suppression system; and
(3) uses carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 5. "Carbon dioxide based fire extinguisher" means a
portable unit:
(1) designed to be used by a single person to fight a small,
localized fire; and
(2) that uses carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 6. "Carbon dioxide based preengineered system" means a
fire suppression system that:
(1) is designed and tested by a manufacturer to be a fixed
system;
(2) has predetermined:
(A) pipe sizes, lengths, and fittings; and
(B) nozzle types and numbers;
(3) is approved or recognized by a nationally significant
testing laboratory, as determined by the board, based on
actual fire tests; and
(4) uses carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 7. "Engineered system" means a fire suppression system
that:
(1) requires individual calculations and design;
(2) uses components that are approved or recognized by a
nationally significant testing laboratory, as determined by the
board, for use in an engineered fire suppression system; and
(3) does not use carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 8. "Fire extinguisher" means a portable unit:
(1) designed to be used by a single person to fight a small,
localized fire; and
(2) that does not use carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 9. "Preengineered system" means a fire suppression system
that:
(1) is designed and tested by a manufacturer to be a fixed
system;
(2) has predetermined:
(A) pipe sizes, lengths, and fittings; and
(B) nozzle types and numbers;
(3) is approved or recognized by a nationally significant
testing laboratory, as determined by the board, based on
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


actual fire tests; and
(4) does not use carbon dioxide as an extinguishing agent.
Sec. 10. "Technician license" refers to the following:
(1) A Class 1 technician license described in IC 25-44-4-1.
(2) A Class 2 technician license described in IC 25-44-4-1.
(3) A Class 3 technician license described in IC 25-44-4-1.
(4) A Class 4 technician license described in IC 25-44-4-1.
Chapter 2. Duties and Powers of the Board; Rulemaking
Sec. 1. (a) The board shall:
(1) enforce and administer this article;
(2) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the administration and
enforcement of this article;
(3) establish standards for the competent practice of fire
suppression equipment professionals;
(4) issue, deny, suspend, and revoke licenses in accordance
with this article;
(5) subject to IC 4-21.5, IC 25-1-7, and IC 25-1-11, discipline
individuals who are licensed under this article for violations
of this article;
(6) establish fees in accordance with IC 25-1-8; and
(7) maintain appropriate records with respect to the
administration of this article.
(b) In establishing standards under subsection (a)(3), the board
shall consider the relevant standards of the National Fire
Protection Association. However, the standards adopted by the
board may not conflict with rules adopted under IC 22-13-2-2.
Sec. 2. (a) The board shall adopt rules concerning the continuing
education required for the renewal of licenses under this article.
(b) The rules must do the following:
(1) Establish procedures for approving organizations that
provide continuing education.
(2) Prescribe the content, duration, and organization of
continuing education courses that contribute to the general
competence of license holders.
Chapter 3. Business Licensing
Sec. 1. (a) A Class A business license authorizes a person to
engage in the business of:
(1) service;
(2) repair;
(3) recharging;
(4) inspection;
(5) installation; or
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


(6) maintenance;
with respect to fire extinguishers.
(b) A Class B business license authorizes a person to:
(1) engage in the business of:
(A) service;
(B) repair;
(C) recharging;
(D) inspection;
(E) installation;
(F) maintenance; or
(G) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers; and
(2) engage in the business of recharging with respect to
carbon dioxide based fire extinguishers.
(c) A Class C business license authorizes a person to:
(1) engage in the business of:
(A) service;
(B) repair;
(C) recharging;
(D) inspection;
(E) installation;
(F) maintenance; or
(G) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers and preengineered systems;
and
(2) engage in the business of recharging with respect to
carbon dioxide based fire extinguishers.
(d) A Class D business license authorizes a person to engage in
the business of:
(1) service;
(2) repair;
(3) recharging;
(4) inspection;
(5) installation;
(6) maintenance; or
(7) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers, preengineered systems,
engineered systems, carbon dioxide based fire extinguishers,
carbon dioxide based preengineered systems, and carbon dioxide
based engineered systems.
Sec. 2. A person may not engage in the business of:
(1) service;
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


(2) repair;
(3) recharging;
(4) inspection;
(5) installation;
(6) maintenance; or
(7) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers, preengineered systems,
engineered systems, carbon dioxide based fire extinguishers,
carbon dioxide based preengineered systems, or carbon dioxide
based engineered systems without first obtaining the appropriate
business license.
Sec. 3. A separate business license is required for each place of
business where the actions described in section 2 of this chapter
occur.
Sec. 4. (a) A business license only allows an individual to engage
in the activities authorized by the license class.
(b) A person holding a business license must follow all
applicable manufacturer's maintenance and installation
instructions with respect to preengineered systems, engineered
systems, carbon dioxide based preengineered systems, and carbon
dioxide based engineered systems.
Sec. 5. To be issued a business license, an individual must do the
following:
(1) Furnish evidence satisfactory to the board showing that
the individual:
(A) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(B) has:
(i) experience;
(ii) equipment; and
(iii) insurance;
commensurate with the class of business license sought;
(C) completed all training prescribed by the board; and
(D) received a passing score on an examination prescribed
or approved by the board.
(2) Submit to a national criminal history background check
under IC 25-1-1.1-4 and furnish satisfactory evidence to the
board that the individual has not been convicted of a crime
that has a direct bearing on the individual's ability to practice
competently.
(3) Apply for the business license in the manner prescribed by
the board.
(4) Pay a fee established by the board.
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


Sec. 6. (a) The board shall establish standards for the conversion
of a business license to a higher or lower class.
(b) The board may convert a business license to a higher or
lower class if the holder of the license:
(1) applies in the manner prescribed by the board;
(2) pays a fee established by the board; and
(3) meets the standards established under subsection (a).
Sec. 7. Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a business license expires on a
date established by the board and may be renewed subject to
section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) An individual who applies to renew a business license
must:
(1) furnish evidence showing successful completion of the
continuing education requirements of this chapter; and
(2) pay the renewal fee established by the board.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a business license
does not renew the business license before the date established by
the board, the business license expires without any action taken by
the board.
(c) If a business license has been expired for not more than three
(3) years, the business license may be reinstated by the board if the
holder of the business license meets the requirements for
reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(d) If a business license has been expired for more than three (3)
years, the business license may be reinstated by the board if the
holder of the business license meets the requirements for
reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
Sec. 9. (a) Renewal notices must be sent in accordance with
IC 25-1-2-6(c).
(b) The renewal fee must be paid in accordance with
IC 25-1-8-2(d).
Chapter 4. Technician Licensing
Sec. 1. (a) A Class 1 technician license authorizes an individual
to:
(1) perform:
(A) a service;
(B) a repair;
(C) recharging;
(D) an inspection;
(E) an installation;
(F) maintenance; or
(G) hydrostatic testing;
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


with respect to fire extinguishers; and
(2) perform recharging with respect to carbon dioxide based
fire extinguishers.
(b) A Class 2 technician license authorizes an individual to:
(1) perform:
(A) a service;
(B) a repair;
(C) recharging;
(D) an inspection;
(E) an installation;
(F) maintenance; or
(G) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers and preengineered systems;
and
(2) perform recharging with respect to carbon dioxide based
fire extinguishers.
(c) A Class 3 technician license authorizes an individual to:
(1) perform:
(A) a service;
(B) a repair;
(C) recharging;
(D) an inspection;
(E) an installation;
(F) maintenance; or
(G) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers, preengineered systems, and
engineered systems; and
(2) perform recharging with respect to carbon dioxide based
fire extinguishers.
(d) A Class 4 technician license authorizes an individual to
perform:
(1) a service;
(2) a repair;
(3) recharging;
(4) an inspection;
(5) an installation;
(6) maintenance; or
(7) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers, preengineered systems,
engineered systems, dioxide based fire extinguishers, carbon
dioxide based preengineered systems, and carbon dioxide based
engineered systems.
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


Sec. 2. A person may not perform:
(1) a service;
(2) a repair;
(3) recharging;
(4) an inspection;
(5) an installation;
(6) maintenance; or
(7) hydrostatic testing;
with respect to fire extinguishers, preengineered systems,
engineered systems, carbon dioxide based fire extinguishers,
carbon dioxide based preengineered systems, or carbon dioxide
based engineered systems without first obtaining the appropriate
technician license.
Sec. 3. (a) A technician license only allows an individual to
engage in the activities authorized by the license class.
(b) An individual holding a technician license must follow all
applicable manufacturer's maintenance and installation
instructions with respect to preengineered systems, engineered
systems, carbon dioxide based preengineered systems, and carbon
dioxide based engineered systems.
Sec. 4. To be issued a technician license, an individual must do
the following:
(1) Furnish evidence satisfactory to the board showing that
the individual:
(A) is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(B) completed all training prescribed by the board; and
(C) received a passing score on an examination prescribed
or approved by the board.
(2) Submit to a national criminal history background check
under IC 25-1-1.1-4 and furnish satisfactory evidence to the
board that the individual has not been convicted of a crime
that has a direct bearing on the individual's ability to practice
competently.
(3) Apply for the technician license in the manner prescribed
by the board.
(4) Pay a fee established by the board.
Sec. 5. Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a technician license expires on
a date established by the board and may be renewed subject to
section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) An individual who applies to renew a technician
license must:
(1) receive a passing score on a renewal examination
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


prescribed or approved by the board; and
(2) pay the renewal fee established by the board.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a technician license
does not renew the technician license before the date established by
the board, the technician license expires without any action taken
by the board.
(c) If a technician license has been expired for not more than
three (3) years, the technician license may be reinstated by the
board if the holder of the technician license meets the requirements
for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(d) If a technician license has been expired for more than three
(3) years, the technician license may be reinstated by the board if
the holder of the technician license meets the requirements for
reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
Sec. 7. (a) Renewal notices must be sent in accordance with
IC 25-1-2-6(c).
(b) The renewal fee must be paid in accordance with
IC 25-1-8-2(d).
Chapter 5. Disciplinary Proceedings; Enforcement
Sec. 1. The board may take disciplinary action against a licensee
for any of the following violations:
(1) Violating this article or rules adopted by the board under
this article.
(2) Making a false or materially misleading representation:
(A) in a license application form or renewal form; or
(B) in information provided to the board.
(3) Failing to pay fees or fines required under this article.
(4) Communicating to the public false or misleading
information concerning the license held.
(5) Failing to complete the continuing education requirements
established by the board.
Sec. 2. The board's conduct of disciplinary hearings is governed
by the procedures set forth in IC 4-21.5.
Sec. 3. The board may summarily suspend a license for up to
ninety (90) days before a final adjudication or during an appeal of
the board's determination if the board finds that the licensee
represents a clear and immediate danger to the public's health,
safety, or property if the licensee is allowed to engage in the actions
permitted by the license held. The summary suspension may be
renewed, upon a hearing before the board, for up to ninety (90)
days.
Sec. 4. (a) When the board determines that an individual not
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153


licensed under this article is engaged in or believed to be engaged
in activities for which a license is required under this article, the
board may issue an order to that individual requiring the
individual to show cause why the individual should not be ordered
to cease and desist from such activities. The show cause order must
set forth a time and place for a hearing at which the affected
individual may appear and show cause as to why the individual
should not be subject to licensing under this article.
(b) If the board, after a hearing, determines that the activities
in which the individual is engaged are subject to licensing under
this article, the board may issue a cease and desist order that
describes the individual and the activities that are the subjects of
the order.
(c) A cease and desist order issued under this section is
enforceable in the circuit or superior courts.
Sec. 5. An individual who:
(1) engages in or offers to engage in activities that require a
license under this article and is not licensed or exempt from
licensing;
(2) presents as the individual's own the license of another;
(3) intentionally gives false or materially misleading
information of any kind to the board or to a board member in
connection with licensing matters;
(4) impersonates another licensee; or
(5) uses an expired, suspended, or revoked license;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. The following are entitled to judicial review under
IC 4-21.5:
(1) An individual who applies for and is denied a license.
(2) A licensee who is aggrieved by an order or a determination
of the board.
Sec. 7. The attorney general shall act as the legal adviser for the
board and provide any legal assistance necessary to carry out this
article.
SECTION 10. IC 35-52-25-67 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 67. IC 25-44-5-5 defines a crime
concerning fire suppression equipment professionals.
2026 IN 1236—LS 6915/DI 153